lexc/noun/enhumelymasik.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§J§ §JP§ 
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§ §JPnull§ §Jnull§ §oeoez26§ §oeoez21§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! szavak:
! orr
! másik
!
LEXICON Noun
!disznó:diszn AddNoun3;  ! disznai enhu2 és enhuero (disznaja) is
acélorr AddNounorr;
aranyorr AddNounorr;
bagolyorr AddNounorr;
bakorr AddNounorr;
betonorr AddNounorr;
birkaorr AddNounorr;
bohócorr AddNounorr;
bokszolóorr AddNounorr;
borvirágorr AddNounorr;
bádogorr AddNounorr;
bárkaorr AddNounorr;
bütyökorr AddNounorr;
cipőorr AddNounorr;
csillagorr AddNounorr;
csizmaorr AddNounorr;
csukaorr AddNounorr;
csónakorr AddNounorr;
csőorr AddNounorr;
cápaorr AddNounorr;
céklaorr AddNounorr;
disznóorr AddNounorr;
edényorr AddNounorr;
egérorr AddNounorr;
elefántorr AddNounorr;
ezüstorr AddNounorr;
faorr AddNounorr;
fémorr AddNounorr;
férfiorr AddNounorr;
fókaorr AddNounorr;
fülorr AddNounorr;
gesztenyeorr AddNounorr;
gomborr AddNounorr;
gumiorr AddNounorr;
gyerekorr AddNounorr;
gémorr AddNounorr; !orrot
géporr AddNounorr;
gólyaorr AddNounorr; !orrot
hagymaorr AddNounorr;
hajóorr AddNounorr; !orrot
harcsaorr AddNounorr;
hegyesorr AddNounorr;
hegyorr AddNounorr;
héjaorr AddNounorr;
hóorr AddNounorr;
indiánorr AddNounorr;
járműorr AddNounorr;
kacororr AddNounorr;
kardorr AddNounorr;
karvalyorr AddNounorr;
kecsegeorr AddNounorr;
kecskeorr AddNounorr;
keménypapírorr AddNounorr;
kenuorr AddNounorr;
keresztorr AddNounorr;
keselyűorr AddNounorr;
királylányorr AddNounorr;
királyorr AddNounorr;
kivetőorr AddNounorr;
kockaorr AddNounorr;
kocsiorr AddNounorr;
korcsolyaorr AddNounorr;
kosorr AddNounorr;
krumpliorr AddNounorr; !orrot
kutyaorr AddNounorr;
kőorr AddNounorr;
lóorr AddNounorr;
macskaorr AddNounorr;
madárorr AddNounorr;
malacorr AddNounorr;
medveorr AddNounorr;
mogyoróorr AddNounorr;
másik AddNoun;
műorr AddNounorr;
nyeregorr AddNounorr;
nyársorr AddNounorr;
orr AddNounorr;
orr AddNounorr; !orrot
palackorr AddNounorr;
papagájorr AddNounorr;
paprikaorr AddNounorr;
papucsorr AddNounorr;
patkányorr AddNounorr;
patkóorr AddNounorr;
perecorr AddNounorr;
profilorr AddNounorr;
pulykaorr AddNounorr;
páviánorr AddNounorr;
rézorr AddNounorr;
rókaorr AddNounorr;
sasorr AddNounorr;
szamárorr AddNounorr;
szarkaorr AddNounorr;
szigetorr AddNounorr;
sziklaorr AddNounorr;
szilvaorr AddNounorr;
sárkányorr AddNounorr;
tacskóorr AddNounorr;
tehénorr AddNounorr;
teknősorr AddNounorr;
tigrisorr AddNounorr;
tokmányorr AddNounorr;
trapézorr AddNounorr;
trombitaorr AddNounorr;
törpeorr AddNounorr;
tülökorr AddNounorr;
uborkaorr AddNounorr;
uszályorr AddNounorr;
vadkanorr AddNounorr;
vasorr AddNounorr;
viaszorr AddNounorr;
vidraorr AddNounorr;
vágóorr AddNounorr;
vízorr AddNounorr;
zúzóorr AddNounorr;
ékorr AddNounorr;
ördögorr AddNounorr;
úrfiorr AddNounorr;
üllőorr AddNounorr;
üvegorr AddNounorr;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez26§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounorr
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possorr;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurorr;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famorr1;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Genorr;

! eredetileg Fam; és nem Famorr
LEXICON Possorr
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^ot    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Famorr;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Famorr;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE21§   Famorr;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famorr;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Famorr;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE21§k   Famorr;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE22§im   Famorr;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE22§id   Famorr;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE22§i   Famorr;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE22§ink   Famorr;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famorr;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE22§ik   Famorr;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                    Genorr1;

LEXICON Plurorr
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genorr;
                            Caseorr1;
        
LEXICON Famorr
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genorr;
                       Genorr;
LEXICON Famorr1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genorr;
                       Genorr1;

LEXICON Genorr
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseorr;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseorr;
                       Caseorr;
LEXICON Genorr1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseorr;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseorr;
                       Caseorr1;
 
LEXICON Caseorr
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Caseorr1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


!LEXICON AddNoun3
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss3;

!LEXICON Poss3
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
